Maryland, session 2026, SB0786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0786*

SENATE BILL 786
10–101.
(l) “Transportation network company” means a company that operates in the
State using a digital network to connect passengers to transportation network operators or
transportation network partners for transportation network services.
(m) “Transportation network operator”, “transportation network partner”, or
“transportation network driver” means an individual who:
(1) has been issued a transportation network operator’s license, or is
otherwise authorized, by the Commission to provide transportation network services;
(2) receives, through a transportation network company’s digital network
application, a connection to a potential passenger to transport the passenger between
points chosen by the passenger in exchange for the payment of a fee to the transportation
network company; and
(3) uses a motor vehicle that is owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for
use by the individual and is approved for use in providing transportation network services
by the Commission.
10–404.
(b) The Commission may approve an applicant to be an operator and issue a
temporary transportation network operator’s license to the applicant if:
(1) the applicant provides all information that the Commission requires for
the application, including the information specified in item (2) of this subsection; and
(2) the Commission is satisfied with the successful submission of the
applicant’s:
(i) national criminal history records check:
1. conducted by a consumer reporting agency as defined
under § 14–1201 of the Commercial Law Article or a comparable entity approved by the
Commission; and
2. that includes:
A. a Multi–State Multi–Jurisdiction Criminal Records
Database Search or a search of a similar nationwide database with validation;
B. a search of the Sex Offender Registry; and
C. a search of the U.S. Department of Justice’s National Sex
Offender Public Website; and

SENATE BILL 786 3
(ii) driving record check that includes a driving history research
report.
Article – Transportation
7–102.1.
(e) (1) The public interest requires the development of an effective and
efficient transit service to meet the special needs of elderly [and handicapped] persons AND
PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES.
(2) When providing transit service to meet the special needs of [disabled]
persons WITH DISABILITIES, the Administration shall:
(i) Apply to the Criminal Justice Information System Central
Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services, in accordance
with paragraph (3) of this subsection, for State and national criminal history records checks
of the Administration’s employees who are or will be employed to provide transit service to
[disabled] persons WITH DISABILITIES;
(ii) Ensure that any entity that contracts with the Administration to
provide transit service to [disabled] persons WITH DISABILITIES applies to the Criminal
Justice Information System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services, in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection, for State and
national criminal history records checks of the contractor’s employees who provide transit
service to [disabled] persons WITH DISABILITIES; and
(iii) Ensure that all employees of the Administration or a contractor
of the Administration who are or will be employed to provide transit service to [disabled]
persons WITH DISABILITIES successfully complete a course, jointly developed by the State
Department of Education and the Department of Disabilities and approved by the
Administration, on matters relating to appropriate accommodation, including customer
service, sensitivity, and respectful and courteous treatment of all passengers, including
[disabled] persons WITH DISABILITIES.
(3) (i) In this paragraph, “Central Repository” has the meaning stated
in § 10–201 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(ii) The Administration or contractor shall apply to the Central
Repository for a State and national criminal history records check for each employee subject
to this subsection.
(iii) As part of the application for a criminal history records check,
the Administration or contractor shall submit to the Central Repository:

SENATE BILL 786
1. Two complete sets of the employee’s legible fingerprints
taken on forms approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation;
2. The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to Maryland criminal history records; and
3. The mandatory processing fee required by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(iv) In accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the Criminal Procedure
Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the employee and the Administration or
contractor a printed statement of the employee’s criminal history record information.
(v) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this
subsection shall be:
1. Confidential and may not be disseminated; and
2. Used only for the purpose authorized by this subsection.
(vi) The subject of a criminal history records check under this
subsection may contest the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central
Repository as provided in § 10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(4) (I) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
2. “TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
3. “TRANSPORTATION NETWORK OPERATOR” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(II) THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION THAT FACILITATES THE PROVISION OF
TRANSIT SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES THROUGH TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK OPERATORS.
(III) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION THAT FACILITATES THE PROVISION OF
TRANSIT SERVICE TO PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES SHALL CONDUCT AN ANNUAL
BACKGROUND SCREENING OF EACH TRANSPORTATION NETWORK OPERATOR
PROVIDING SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES THROUGH THE

SENATE BILL 786 5
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER §
10–404(B)(2) OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.